District of Columbia statutes.
47-1009

Appeals from assessments.

(a)

(1)

Within 6 months after the date on which the Mayor mails written denial of an exemption under §§ 47-1002, 47-1005, and 47-1007 to 47-1010, any institution, organization, corporation, or association aggrieved by any assessment, classification, equalization, or valuation of real property deemed to be exempt from taxation under the provisions of §§ 47-1002, 47-1005, and 47-1007 to 47-1010 may appeal to the Superior Court of the District of Columbia in the same manner and to the same extent as is provided in §§ 47-3303 and 47-3304. Payment of the tax bill shall not be a prerequisite for the appeal.

(2)

Approval of the assessment rolls described in § 47-825(g) [repealed], shall not preclude the Mayor from making decisions on applications for exemptions filed before July 1st and pending before the Mayor at the time the assessment roll is approved, and all decisions in regard to the application shall be appealable as provided in paragraph (1) of this subsection.

(b)

(1)

Applications for exemption from the real property tax must be received on or before September 30 to obtain the exemption for the full tax year. If approved, the exemption will become effective as of October 1 of the tax year for which the exemption is granted.

(2)

Effective October 1, 1994, and for each tax year thereafter:

(A)

Any real property eligible for exemption from real property tax under § 47-1002 shall be exempt from real property tax as of the first month following the date on which a properly completed application has been filed. Real property tax shall be prorated on a monthly basis. The Mayor may prorate the real property tax to the date the property is eligible for an exemption from real property tax. Real property is eligible for an exemption from real property tax if it meets the requirements set forth in § 47-1002 and a properly completed application is filed with the Mayor.

(B)

When real property exempt from real property tax, as provided for in this section, becomes ineligible for the exemption, the owner of the real property shall notify the Mayor (in a manner and at a time as the Mayor may prescribe by regulation) of the real property’s ineligibility. The Mayor shall terminate the exemption effective as of the first full month following the date the property became ineligible for the exemption.

History

Dec. 24, 1942, 56 Stat. 1091, ch. 826, § 5
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 573, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 156(c)
Mar. 13, 1985, D.C. Law 5-130, § 2, 31 DCR 5199
Sept. 30, 1993, D.C. Law 10-25, § 107, 40 DCR 5489
June 14, 1994, D.C. Law 10-127, § 6, 41 DCR 2050
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575

Section References

This section is referenced in § 42-1108.01, § 47-903, § 47-1003, § 47-1005.02, § 47-1010.01, § 47-1038, § 47-1039, § 47-1040, § 47-1041, § 47-1042, § 47-1043, § 47-1044, § 47-1045, § 47-1046, § 47-1049, § 47-1051, § 47-1054, § 47-1056, § 47-1057, § 47-1060, § 47-1061, § 47-1062, § 47-1066, § 47-1068, § 47-1069, § 47-1070, § 47-1071, § 47-1072, § 47-1079, § 47-1080, § 47-1082, § 47-1084, § 47-1086, § 47-1087, § 47-1089, § 47-1091, § 47-1092, § 47-4620, § 47-4633, § 47-4636, § 47-4639, § 47-4641, § 47-4642, § 47-4651, § 47-4655, and § 47-4657.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-1009.
1973 Ed., § 47-801e.

Temporary Legislation

Section 4 of D.C. Law 16-7 amended § 3(a) of D.C. Law 10-189, set out as a Miscellaneous Note below, by substituting “as an arena” for “as a downtown sports arena”.
Section 6(b) of D.C. Law 16-7 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.

Editor's Notes

Real property tax exemption for downtown sports arena: Section 3 of D.C. Law 10-189, the Arena Tax Amendment Act of 1994, as amended by D.C. Law 16-191, § 30, provided:

“(a) Notwithstanding any other law, that portion of the real property, described as lot 0047 in square 0455, in preparation for occupation and use, under construction for occupation or use, or occupied and used as a multi-purpose arena and related amenities shall be exempt from real property taxation, possessory interest taxation and business improvement district taxation.

“(b) The exemption provided by this section shall apply so long as the Land Disposition Agreement—Ground Lease, by and between The District of Columbia Redevelopment Land Agency, The District of Columbia, and DC Arena, LP, dated as of December 29, 1995 and recorded with the Recorder of Deeds on January 5, 1996 as instrument number 9600001285, remains in effect.

(b) This section shall apply as of September 28, 1994.”

Jewish War Veterans, U.S.A. National Memorial, Incorporated: Public Law 98-486 provided that certain property of the Jewish War Veterans, U.S.A. National Memorial, Incorporated, is exempt from taxation by the District of Columbia.